Illinois, session 104th, HB3251.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-22 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-22)  (from Ch. 122, par. 27-22)7    Sec. 27-22. Required high school courses. 8    (a) (Blank). 9    (b) (Blank).10    (c) (Blank).11    (d) (Blank).12    (e) Through the 2023-2024 school year, as a prerequisite 13to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil entering the 149th grade must, in addition to other course requirements, 15successfully complete all of the following courses:16        (1) Four years of language arts.17        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 18    which must be English and the other of which may be English 19    or any other subject. When applicable, writing-intensive 20    courses may be counted towards the fulfillment of other 21    graduation requirements. 22        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 23    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and   HB3251- 2 -LRB104 09623 LNS 19688 b1    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 2    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 3    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 4    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 5    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 6    path.7        (3.5) For pupils entering the 9th grade in the 8    2022-2023 school year and 2023-2024 school year, one year 9    of a course that includes intensive instruction in 10    computer literacy, which may be English, social studies, 11    or any other subject and which may be counted toward the 12    fulfillment of other graduation requirements. 13        (4) Two years of science.14        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 15    year must be history of the United States or a combination 16    of history of the United States and American government 17    and, beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in the 18    2016-2017 school year and each school year thereafter, at 19    least one semester must be civics, which shall help young 20    people acquire and learn to use the skills, knowledge, and 21    attitudes that will prepare them to be competent and 22    responsible citizens throughout their lives. Civics course 23    content shall focus on government institutions, the 24    discussion of current and controversial issues, service 25    learning, and simulations of the democratic process. Each 26    required civics class shall guide students through the   HB3251- 3 -LRB104 09623 LNS 19688 b1    voter registration process, and if the student is of 2    eligible age in accordance with State law, allow students 3    to preregister to vote. A student or the student's parent 4    or legal guardian may opt the student out of 5    preregistration. School districts may utilize private 6    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 7    education. Beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in 8    the 2021-2022 school year, one semester, or part of one 9    semester, may include a financial literacy course.10        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 11    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 12    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 13    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 14    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 15    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 16    requirement under this subdivision (6). 17    (e-5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, as a 18prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 19entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 20requirements, successfully complete all of the following 21courses: 22        (1) Four years of language arts.23        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 24    which must be English and the other of which may be English 25    or any other subject. If applicable, writing-intensive 26    courses may be counted toward the fulfillment of other   HB3251- 4 -LRB104 09623 LNS 19688 b1    graduation requirements.2        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 3    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 4    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 5    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 6    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 7    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 8    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 9    path.10        (3.5) One year of a course that includes intensive 11    instruction in computer literacy, which may be English, 12    social studies, or any other subject and which may be 13    counted toward the fulfillment of other graduation 14    requirements. 15        (4) Two years of laboratory science.16        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 17    year must be history of the United States or a combination 18    of history of the United States and American government 19    and at least one semester must be civics, which shall help 20    young people acquire and learn to use the skills, 21    knowledge, and attitudes that will prepare them to be 22    competent and responsible citizens throughout their lives. 23    Civics course content shall focus on government 24    institutions, the discussion of current and controversial 25    issues, service learning, and simulations of the 26    democratic process. School districts may utilize private   HB3251- 5 -LRB104 09623 LNS 19688 b1    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 2    education. One semester, or part of one semester, may 3    include a financial literacy course.4        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 5    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 6    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 7    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 8    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 9    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 10    requirement under this subdivision (6). 11    (e-10) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, as a 12prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 13entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 14requirements, successfully complete 2 years of foreign 15language courses, which may include American Sign Language. A 16pupil may choose a third year of foreign language to satisfy 17the requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection (e-5). 18    (f) The State Board of Education shall develop and inform 19school districts of standards for writing-intensive 20coursework. 21    (f-5) If a school district offers an Advanced Placement 22computer science course to high school students, then the 23school board must designate that course as equivalent to a 24high school mathematics course and must denote on the 25student's transcript that the Advanced Placement computer 26science course qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative   HB3251- 6 -LRB104 09623 LNS 19688 b1course for students in accordance with subdivision (3) of 2subsection (e) of this Section. 3    (g) Public Act 83-1082 does not apply to pupils entering 4the 9th grade in 1983-1984 school year and prior school years 5or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 6determined by an individualized education program. 7    Public Act 94-676 does not apply to pupils entering the 89th grade in the 2004-2005 school year or a prior school year 9or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 10determined by an individualized education program. 11    Subdivision (3.5) of subsection (e) does not apply to 12pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school year or a 13prior school year or to students with disabilities whose 14course of study is determined by an individualized education 15program. 16    Subsection (e-5) does not apply to pupils entering the 9th 17grade in the 2023-2024 school year or a prior school year or to 18students with disabilities whose course of study is determined 19by an individualized education program. Subsection (e-10) does 20not apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 21school year or a prior school year or to students with 22disabilities whose course of study is determined by an 23individualized education program. 24    (h) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 25provisions of Sections 14A-32 and 27-22.05 of this Code and 26the Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act.   HB3251- 7 -LRB104 09623 LNS 19688 b1    (i) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to modify 2the requirements of this Section for any students enrolled in 3grades 9 through 12 if the Governor has declared a disaster due 4to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 5Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 6(Source: P.A. 102-366, eff. 8-13-21; 102-551, eff. 1-1-22; 7102-864, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff. 88-2-24.)